Washington statutes.
RCW 19.320.040

Liability.

Any domestic employer or international labor recruitment agency which fails to complete the requirements of this chapter with respect to any foreign worker is liable to that foreign worker in a civil action by the foreign worker. The court shall award to a foreign worker who prevails in an action under this section an amount between two hundred dollars and five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater. The court may also award other equitable relief. A foreign worker who prevails in an action under this section must be awarded court costs and attorneys' fees.

[ 2010 c 142 s 3.]